California statutes. Probate Code
(c) The protection provided by this section does not affect the rights of the person who executed the provision for transfer of the property and other persons having an interest in the property or their successors in disputes among themselves concerning the beneficial ownership of the property.

(d) The protection provided by this section is not exclusive of any protection provided the holder of the property by any other provision of law.

(e) A person shall not serve notice under paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) in bad faith. If the court in an action or proceeding relating to the rights of the parties determines that a person has served notice under paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) in bad faith, the court shall award against the person the cost of the action or proceeding, including a reasonable attorney’s fee, and the damages caused by the service.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 417, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Nonprobate Transfers of Community Property [5010. - 5032.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [5010. - 5015.]

5010.

As used in this chapter, “written consent” to a provision for a nonprobate transfer of community property on death includes a written joinder in such a provision.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 51, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

5011.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this part, the rights of the parties in a nonprobate transfer of community property on death are subject to all of the following:

(a) The terms of the instrument under which the nonprobate transfer is made.

(b) A contrary state statute specifically applicable to the instrument under which the nonprobate transfer is made.

(c) A written expression of intent of a party in the provision for transfer of the property or in a written consent to the provision.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 51, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

5012.

A provision of this chapter concerning rights between a married person and the person’s spouse in community property is relevant only to controversies between the person and spouse and their successors and does not affect the obligation of a holder of community property under an instrument of a type described in Section 5000 to hold, receive, or transfer the property in compliance with a provision for a nonprobate transfer on death, or the protection provided the holder by Section 5003.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 51, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

5013.

Nothing in this chapter limits the effect of a surviving spouse’s waiver of rights in community property under Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 140) of Part 3 of Division 2 or other instrument or agreement that affects a married person’s interest in community property.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 51, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

5014.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), this chapter applies to a provision for a nonprobate transfer of community property on the death of a married person, regardless of whether the provision for transfer of the property was executed by the person, or written consent to the provision for transfer of the property was given by the person’s spouse, before, on, or after January 1, 1993.

(b) Subdivision (c) of Section 5030 does not apply, and the applicable law in effect on the date of death does apply, to revocation of a written consent given by a spouse who died before January 1, 1993.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 51, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

5015.

Nothing in this chapter limits the application of principles of fraud, undue influence, duress, mistake, or other invalidating cause to a written consent to a provision for a nonprobate transfer of community property on death.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 51, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Consent to Nonprobate Transfer [5020. - 5023.]

5020.

A provision for a nonprobate transfer of community property on death executed by a married person without the written consent of the person’s spouse (1) is not effective as to the nonconsenting spouse’s interest in the property and (2) does not affect the nonconsenting spouse’s disposition on death of the nonconsenting spouse’s interest in the community property by will, intestate succession, or nonprobate transfer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 51, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

5021.

(a) In a proceeding to set aside a nonprobate transfer of community property on death made pursuant to a provision for transfer of the property executed by a married person without the written consent of the person’s spouse, the court shall set aside the transfer as to the nonconsenting spouse’s interest in the property, subject to terms and conditions or other remedies that appear equitable under the circumstances of the case, taking into account the rights of all interested persons.

(b) Nothing in subdivision (a) affects any additional remedy the nonconsenting spouse may have against the person’s estate for a nonprobate transfer of community property on death without the spouse’s written consent.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 51, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

5022.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), a spouse’s written consent to a provision for a nonprobate transfer of community property on death is not a transmutation of the consenting spouse’s interest in the property.

(b) This chapter does not apply to a spouse’s written consent to a provision for a nonprobate transfer of community property on death that satisfies Section 852 of the Family Code. Such a consent is a transmutation and is governed by the law applicable to transmutations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 219, Sec. 224.3.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

5023.

(a) As used in this section “modification” means revocation of a provision for a nonprobate transfer on death in whole or part, designation of a different beneficiary, or election of a different benefit or payment option. As used in this section, “modification” does not mean, and this section does not apply to, the exercise of a power of appointment under a trust.

(b) If a married person executes a provision for a nonprobate transfer of community property on death with the written consent of the person’s spouse and thereafter executes a modification of the provision for transfer of the property without written consent of the spouse, the modification is effective as to the person’s interest in the community property and has the following effect on the spouse’s interest in the community property:

(1) If the person executes the modification during the spouse’s lifetime, the modification revokes the spouse’s previous written consent to the provision for transfer of the property.

(2) If the person executes the modification after the spouse’s death, the modification does not affect the spouse’s previous written consent to the provision for transfer of the property, and the spouse’s interest in the community property is subject to the nonprobate transfer on death as consented to by the spouse.

(3) If a written expression of intent of a party in the provision for transfer of the property or in the written consent to the provision for transfer of the property authorizes the person to execute a modification after the spouse’s death, the spouse’s interest in the community property is deemed transferred to the married person on the spouse’s death, and the modification is effective as to both the person’s and the spouse’s interests in the community property.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 527, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Revocation of Consent [5030. - 5032.]

5030.

(a) A spouse’s written consent to a provision for a nonprobate transfer of community property on death is revocable during the marriage.

(b) On termination of the marriage by dissolution or on legal separation, the written consent is revocable and the community property is subject to division under Division 7 (commencing with Section 2500) of the Family Code or other disposition on order within the jurisdiction of the court.

(c) On the death of either spouse, the written consent is irrevocable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 219, Sec. 224.5.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

5031.

(a) If a married person executes a provision for a nonprobate transfer of community property on death with the written consent of the person’s spouse, the consenting spouse may revoke the consent by a writing, including a will, that identifies the provision for transfer of the property being revoked, and that is served on the married person before the married person’s death.

(b) Revocation of a spouse’s written consent to a provision for a nonprobate transfer of community property on death does not affect the authority of the holder of the property to transfer the property in compliance with the provision for transfer of the property to the extent provided in Section 5003.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 51, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

5032.

On revocation of a spouse’s written consent to a nonprobate transfer of community property on death, the property passes in the same manner as if the consent had not been given.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 51, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Nonprobate Transfer to Former Spouse [5040. - 5048.]

5040.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), a nonprobate transfer to the transferor’s former spouse, in an instrument executed by the transferor before or during the marriage or registered domestic partnership, fails if, at the time of the transferor’s death, the former spouse is not the transferor’s surviving spouse as defined in Section 78, as a result of the dissolution or annulment of the marriage or termination of registered domestic partnership. A judgment of legal separation that does not terminate the status of spouses is not a dissolution for purposes of this section.

(b) Subdivision (a) does not cause a nonprobate transfer to fail in any of the following cases:

(1) The nonprobate transfer is not subject to revocation by the transferor at the time of the transferor’s death.

(2) There is clear and convincing evidence that the transferor intended to preserve the nonprobate transfer to the former spouse.

(3) A court order that the nonprobate transfer be maintained on behalf of the former spouse is in effect at the time of the transferor’s death.

(c) Where a nonprobate transfer fails by operation of this section, the instrument making the nonprobate transfer shall be treated as it would if the former spouse failed to survive the transferor.

(d) Nothing in this section affects the rights of a subsequent purchaser or encumbrancer for value in good faith who relies on the apparent failure of a nonprobate
 transfer under this section or who lacks knowledge of the failure of a nonprobate transfer under this section.

(e) As used in this section, “nonprobate transfer” means a provision, other than a provision of a life insurance policy, of either of the following types:

(1) A provision of a type described in Section 5000.

(2) A provision in an instrument that operates on death, other than a will, conferring a power of appointment or naming a trustee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 50, Sec. 83.   (SB 1005)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

5042.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), a joint tenancy between the decedent and the decedent’s former spouse, created before or during the marriage or registered domestic partnership, is severed as to the decedent’s interest if, at the time of the decedent’s death, the former spouse is not the decedent’s surviving spouse as defined in Section 78, as a result of the dissolution or annulment of the marriage or registered domestic partnership. A judgment of legal separation that does not terminate the status of spouses is not a dissolution for purposes of this section.

(b) Subdivision (a) does not sever a joint tenancy in either of the following cases:

(1) The
 joint tenancy is not subject to severance by the decedent at the time of the decedent’s death.

(2) There is clear and convincing evidence that the decedent intended to preserve the joint tenancy in favor of the former spouse.

(c) Nothing in this section affects the rights of a subsequent purchaser or encumbrancer for value in good faith who relies on an apparent severance under this section or who lacks knowledge of a severance under this section.

(d) For purposes of this section, property held in “joint tenancy” includes property held as community property with right of survivorship, as described in Section 682.1 of the Civil Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 50, Sec. 84.   (SB 1005)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

5044.

(a) Nothing in this chapter affects the rights of a purchaser or encumbrancer of real property for value who in good faith relies on an affidavit or a declaration under penalty of perjury under the laws of this state that states all of the following:

(1) The name of the decedent.

(2) The date and place of the decedent’s death.

(3) A description of the real property transferred to the affiant or declarant by an instrument making a nonprobate transfer or by operation of joint tenancy survivorship.

(4) Either of the following, as appropriate:

(A) The affiant or declarant is the surviving spouse of the decedent.

(B) The affiant or declarant is not the surviving spouse of the decedent, but the rights of the affiant or declarant to the described property are not affected by Section 5040 or 5042.

(b) A person relying on an affidavit or declaration made pursuant to subdivision (a) has no duty to inquire into the truth of the matters stated in the affidavit or declaration.

(c) An affidavit or declaration made pursuant to subdivision (a) may be recorded.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 5602 by Stats. 2015, Ch. 293, Sec. 14.   (AB 139)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

5046.

Nothing in this chapter is intended to limit the court’s authority to order a party to a dissolution or annulment of marriage to maintain the former spouse as a beneficiary on any nonprobate transfer described in this chapter, or to preserve a joint tenancy in favor of the former spouse.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 5603 by Stats. 2015, Ch. 293, Sec. 15.   (AB 139)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

5048.

(a) This chapter, formerly Part 4 (commencing with Section 5600), is operative on January 1, 2002.

(b) Except as provided in subdivision (c), this chapter applies to an instrument making a nonprobate transfer or creating a joint tenancy whether executed before, on, or after the operative date of this chapter.

(c) Sections 5040 and 5042 do not apply, and the applicable law in effect before the operative date of this chapter applies, to an instrument making a nonprobate transfer or creating a joint tenancy in either of the following circumstances:

(1) The person making the nonprobate transfer or creating the joint tenancy dies before the operative date of this chapter.

(2) The dissolution of marriage or other event that terminates the status of the nonprobate transfer beneficiary or joint tenant as a surviving spouse occurs before the operative date of this chapter.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 5604 by Stats. 2015, Ch. 293, Sec. 16.   (AB 139)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 2. MULTIPLE-PARTY ACCOUNTS [5100. - 5407.]



  CHAPTER 1. Short Title and Definitions [5100. - 5152.]



  ARTICLE 1. Short Title [5100. - 5100.]

5100.

This part may be cited as the California Multiple-Party Accounts Law.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Definitions [5120. - 5152.]

5120.

Unless the provision or context otherwise requires, the definitions in this article govern the construction of this part.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

5122.

(a) “Account” means a contract of deposit of funds between a depositor and a financial institution, and includes a checking account, savings account, certificate of deposit, share account, and other like arrangement.

(b) “Account” does not include:

(1) An account established for deposit of funds of a partnership, joint venture, or other association for business purposes.

(2) An account controlled by one or more persons as the duly authorized agent or trustee for a corporation, unincorporated association, or charitable or civic organization.

(3) A regular fiduciary or trust account where the relationship is established other than by deposit agreement.

(4) An account established for the deposit of funds of the estate of a ward, conservatee, or decedent.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

5124.

“Agent” means a person who has a present right, subject to request, to payment from an account as an attorney in fact under a power of attorney.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

5126.

“Beneficiary” means a person named in a Totten trust account as one for whom a party to the account is named as trustee.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

5128.

“Financial institution” includes:

(a) A financial institution as defined in Section 40.

(b) An industrial loan company as defined in Section 18003 of the Financial Code.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

5130.

“Joint account” means an account payable on request to one or more of two or more parties whether or not mention is made of any right of survivorship.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

5132.

A “multiple-party account” is any of the following types of account:

(a) A joint account.

(b) A P.O.D. account.

(c) A Totten trust account.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

5134.

(a) “Net contribution” of a party to an account as of any given time is the sum of all of the following:

(1) All deposits thereto made by or for the party, less all withdrawals made by or for the party that have not been paid to or applied to the use of any other party.

(2) A pro rata share of any interest or dividends earned, whether or not included in the current balance.

(3) Any proceeds of deposit life insurance added to the account by reason of the death of the party whose net contribution is in question.

(b) In the absence of proof otherwise:

(1) Only parties who have a present right of withdrawal shall be considered as having a net contribution.

(2) The net contribution of each of the parties having a present right of withdrawal is deemed to be an equal amount.

(c) It is the intent of the Legislature in enacting this section to provide a definition for the purpose of determining ownership interests in an account as between the parties to the account, and not as between the parties and the financial institution.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

5136.

(a) “Party” means a person who, by the terms of the account, has a present right, subject to request, to payment from a multiple-party account other than as an agent.

(b) A P.O.D. payee is a party, by reason of being a P.O.D. payee, only after the account becomes payable to the payee by reason of surviving all persons named as original payees.

(c) A beneficiary of a Totten trust account is a party, by reason of being a beneficiary, only after the account becomes payable to the beneficiary by reason of surviving all persons named as trustees.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

5138.

“Payment” of sums on deposit includes all of the following:

(a) A withdrawal, including payment on check or other directive of a party.

(b) A pledge of sums of deposit.

(c) A setoff, reduction, or other disposition of all or part of an account pursuant to a pledge.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

5139.

“P.O.D.” means pay on death.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

5140.

“P.O.D. account” means any of the following:

(a) An account payable on request to one person during the person’s lifetime and on the person’s death to one or more P.O.D. payees.

(b) An account payable on request to one or more persons during their lifetimes and on the death of all of them to one or more P.O.D. payees.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

5142.

“P.O.D. payee” means a person designated on a P.O.D. account as one to whom the account is payable on request after the death of one or more persons.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

5144.

“Proof of death” includes any of the following:

(a) An original or attested or certified copy of a death certificate.

(b) A record or report that is prima facie evidence of death under Section 103550 of the Health and Safety Code, Sections 1530 to 1532, inclusive, of the Evidence Code, or another statute of this state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1023, Sec. 400.   Effective September 29, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

5146.

Except to the extent the terms of the account or deposit agreement expressly provide otherwise, a financial institution “receives” an order or notice under this part when it is received by the particular office or branch office of the financial instutition where the account is carried.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

5148.

“Request” means a proper request for withdrawal, including a check or order for payment, that complies with all conditions of the account (including special requirements concerning necessary signatures) and regulations of the financial institution; but, if the financial institution conditions withdrawal or payment on advance notice, for purposes of this part the request for withdrawal or payment is treated as immediately effective and a notice of intent to withdraw is treated as a request for withdrawal.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

5150.

“Sums on deposit” means both of the following:

(a) The balance payable on an account, including interest and dividends earned, whether or not included in the current balance.

(b) Any life insurance proceeds added to the account by reason of the death of a party.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

5152.

“Withdrawal” includes payment to a third person pursuant to a check or other directive of a party or an agent.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. General Provisions [5201. - 5205.]

5201.

(a) The provisions of Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 5301) concerning beneficial ownership as between parties, or as between parties and P.O.D. payees or beneficiaries of multiple-party accounts, are relevant only to controversies between these persons and their creditors and other successors, and have no bearing on the power of withdrawal of these persons as determined by the terms of account contracts.

(b) The provisions of Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 5401) govern the liability of financial institutions who make payments pursuant to that chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

5202.

Nothing in this part affects the law relating to transfers in fraud of creditors.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

5203.

(a) Words in substantially the following form in a signature card, passbook, contract, or instrument evidencing an account, or words to the same effect, executed before, on, or after July 1, 1990, create the following accounts:

(1) Joint account: “This account or certificate is owned by the named parties. Upon the death of any of them, ownership passes to the survivor(s).”

(2) P.O.D. account with single party: “This account or certificate is owned by the named party. Upon the death of that party, ownership passes to the named pay-on-death payee(s).”

(3) P.O.D. account with multiple parties: “This account or certificate is owned by the named parties. Upon the death of any of them, ownership passes to the survivor(s). Upon the death of all of them, ownership passes to the named pay-on-death payee(s).”

(4) Joint account of spouses with right of survivorship: “This account or certificate is owned by the named parties, who are spouses, and is presumed to be their community property. Upon the death of either of them, ownership passes to the survivor.”

(5) Community property account of spouses: “This account or certificate is the community property of the named parties who are spouses. The ownership during lifetime and after the death of a spouse is determined by the law applicable to community property generally and may be affected by a will.”

(6) Tenancy
 in common account: “This account or certificate is owned by the named parties as tenants in common. Upon the death of any party, the ownership interest of that party passes to the named pay-on-death payee(s) of that party or, if none, to the estate of that party.”

(b) Use of the form language provided in this section is not necessary to create an account that is governed by this part. If the contract of deposit creates substantially the same relationship between the parties as an account created using the form language provided in this section, this part applies to the same extent as if the form language had been used.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 50, Sec. 85.   (SB 1005)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

5204.

(a) In addition to a power of attorney otherwise authorized by law, a special power of attorney is authorized under this section to apply to one or more accounts at a financial institution or to one or more contracts with a financial institution concerning safe deposit services. For the purposes of this section, “account” includes checking accounts, savings accounts, certificates of deposit, savings certificates, and any other depository relationship with the financial institution.

(b) The special power of attorney under this section shall:

(1) Be in writing.

(2) Be signed by the person or persons giving the power of attorney.

(3) Explicitly identify the attorney-in-fact or attorneys-in-fact, the financial institution, and the accounts or contracts subject to the power.

(c) The special power of attorney shall contain language in substantially the following form:

“WARNING TO PERSON EXECUTING THIS DOCUMENT: This is an important legal document. It creates a power of attorney that provides the person you designate as your attorney-in-fact with the broad powers it sets forth. You have the right to terminate this power of attorney. If there is anything about this form that you do not understand, you should ask a lawyer to explain it to you.”

(d) In addition to the language required by subdivision (c), special powers of attorney that are or may be durable shall also contain substantially the following language:

“These powers of attorney shall continue even if you later become disabled or incapacitated.”

(e) The power of attorney granted under this section shall endure as between the grantor and grantee of the power until the earliest of the following occurs:

(1) Revocation by the grantor of the power.

(2) Termination of the account.

(3) Death of the grantor of the power.

(4) In the case of a nondurable power of attorney, appointment of a guardian or conservator of the estate of the grantor of the power.

(f) A financial institution may rely in good faith upon the validity of the power of attorney granted under this section and is not liable to the principal or any other person for doing so if (1) the power of attorney is on file with the financial institution and the transaction is made by the attorney-in-fact named in the power of attorney, (2) the power of attorney appears on its face to be valid, and (3) the financial institution has convincing evidence of the identity of the person signing the power of attorney as principal.

(g) For the purposes of subdivision (f), “convincing evidence” requires both of the following:

(1) Reasonable reliance on a document that satisfies the requirement of Section 4751.

(2) The absence of any information, evidence, or other circumstances that would lead a reasonable person to believe that the person signing the power of attorney as principal is not the individual he or she claims to be.

(h) The protection provided by subdivision (f) does not extend to payments made after written notice is received by the financial institution as to any of the events of termination of the power under subdivision (e) if the financial institution has had a reasonable time to act on the notice. No other notice or any other information shown to have been available to the financial institution shall affect its right to the protection provided by this subdivision.

(i) The attorney-in-fact acting under the power of attorney granted under this section shall maintain books or records to permit an accounting of the acts of the attorney-in-fact if an accounting is requested by a legal representative of the grantor of the power.

(j) The attorney-in-fact acting under a power of attorney granted under this section is liable for any disbursement other than a disbursement to or for the benefit of the grantor of the power, unless the grantor has authorized the disbursement in writing.

(k) Nothing in this section limits the use or effect of any other form of power of attorney for transactions with a financial institution. Nothing in this section creates an implication that a financial institution is liable for acting in reliance upon a power of attorney under circumstances where the requirements of subdivision (f) are not satisfied. Nothing in this section affects any immunity that may otherwise exist apart from this section.

(l) Nothing in this section prevents the attorney-in-fact from also being designated as a P.O.D. payee.

(m) Except as otherwise provided in this section, the Power of Attorney Law, Division 4.5 (commencing with Section 4000) shall not apply to a special power of attorney under this section. Section 4130 and Part 5 (commencing with Section 4900) of Division 4.5 shall apply to a special power of attorney under this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 300, Sec. 15.   Effective August 3, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

5205.

This part applies to accounts in existence on July 1, 1990, and accounts thereafter established.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Ownership Between Parties and Their Creditors and Successors [5301. - 5307.]

5301.

(a) An account belongs, during the lifetime of all parties, to the parties in proportion to the net contributions by each, unless there is clear and convincing evidence of a different intent.

(b) If a party makes an excess withdrawal from an account, the other parties to the account shall have an ownership interest in the excess withdrawal in proportion to the net contributions of each to the amount on deposit in the account immediately following the excess withdrawal, unless there is clear and convincing evidence of a contrary agreement between the parties.

(c) Only a living party, or a conservator, guardian, or agent
 acting on behalf of a living party, shall be permitted to make a claim to recover the living party’s ownership interest in an excess withdrawal, pursuant to subdivision (b). A court may, at its discretion, and in the interest of justice, reduce any recovery under this section to reflect funds withdrawn and applied for the benefit of the claiming party.

(d) In the case of a P.O.D. account, the P.O.D. payee has no rights to the sums on deposit during the lifetime of any party, unless there is clear and convincing evidence of a different intent.

(e) In the case of a Totten trust account, the beneficiary has no rights to the sums on deposit during the lifetime of any party, unless there is clear and convincing evidence of a different intent. If there is an irrevocable trust, the account belongs beneficially to the beneficiary.

(f) For purposes of this section, “excess withdrawal” means the amount of a party’s withdrawal that exceeds that party’s net contribution on deposit in the account immediately preceding the withdrawal.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 235, Sec. 1.   (AB 1624)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

5302.

Subject to Section 5040:

(a) Sums remaining on deposit at the death of a party to a joint account belong to the surviving party or parties as against the estate of the decedent unless there is clear and convincing evidence of a different intent. If there are two or more surviving parties, their respective ownerships during lifetime are in proportion to their previous ownership interests under Section 5301 augmented by an equal share for each survivor of any interest the decedent may have owned in the account immediately before the decedent’s death; and the right of survivorship continues between the surviving parties.

(b) If the account is a P.O.D. account:

(1) On death of one of two or more parties, the rights to any sums remaining on deposit are governed by subdivision (a).

(2) On death of the sole party or of the survivor of two or more parties, (A) any sums remaining on deposit belong to the P.O.D. payee or payees if surviving, or to the survivor of them if one or more die before the party, (B) if two or more P.O.D. payees survive, any sums remaining on deposit belong to them in equal and undivided shares unless the terms of the account or deposit agreement expressly provide for different shares, and (C) if two or more P.O.D. payees survive, there is no right of survivorship in the event of death of a P.O.D. payee thereafter unless the terms of the account or deposit agreement
 expressly provide for survivorship between them.

(c) If the account is a Totten trust account:

(1) On death of one of two or more trustees, the rights to any sums remaining on deposit are governed by subdivision (a).

(2) On death of the sole trustee or the survivor of two or more trustees, (A) any sums remaining on deposit belong to the person or persons named as beneficiaries, if surviving, or to the survivor of them if one or more die before the trustee, unless there is clear and convincing evidence of a different intent, (B) if two or more beneficiaries survive, any sums remaining on deposit belong to them in equal and undivided shares unless the terms of the account or deposit agreement expressly provide for different
 shares, and (C) if two or more beneficiaries survive, there is no right of survivorship in event of death of any beneficiary thereafter unless the terms of the account or deposit agreement expressly provide for survivorship between them.

(d) In other cases, the death of any party to a multiparty account has no effect on beneficial ownership of the account other than to transfer the rights of the decedent as part of the decedent’s estate.

(e) A right of survivorship arising from the express terms of the account or under this section, a beneficiary designation in a Totten trust account, or a P.O.D. payee designation, cannot be changed by will.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 293, Sec. 9.   (AB 139)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

5303.

(a) The provisions of Section 5302 as to rights of survivorship are determined by the form of the account at the death of a party.

(b) Once established, the terms of a multiple-party account can be changed only by any of the following methods:

(1) Closing the account and reopening it under different terms.

(2) Presenting to the financial institution a modification agreement that is signed by all parties with a present right of withdrawal. If the financial institution has a form for this purpose, it may require use of the form.

(3) If the provisions of the terms of the account or deposit agreement provide a method of modification of the terms of the account, complying with those provisions.

(4) As provided in subdivision (c) of Section 5405.

(c) During the lifetime of a party, the terms of the account may be changed as provided in subdivision (b) to eliminate or to add rights of survivorship. Withdrawal of funds from the account by a party also eliminates rights of survivorship with respect to the funds withdrawn to the extent of the withdrawing party’s net contribution to the account.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 235, Sec. 2.   (AB 1624)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

5304.

Any transfers resulting from the application of Section 5302 are effective by reason of the account contracts involved and this part and are not to be considered as testamentary. The right under this part of a surviving party to a joint account, or of a beneficiary, or of a P.O.D. payee, to the sums on deposit on the death of a party to a multiple-party account shall not be denied, abridged, or affected because such right has not been created by a writing executed in accordance with the laws of this state prescribing the requirements to effect a valid testamentary disposition of property.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

5305.

(a) Notwithstanding Sections 5301 to 5303, inclusive, if parties to an account are married to each other, whether or not they are so described in the deposit agreement, their net contribution to the account is presumed to be and remain their community property.

(b) Notwithstanding Sections 2581 and 2640 of the Family Code, the presumption established by this section is a presumption affecting the burden of proof and may be rebutted by proof of either of the following:

(1) The sums on deposit that are claimed to be separate property can be traced from separate property unless it is proved that the married persons made a written agreement that expressed their clear intent that the sums be their community property.

(2) The married persons made a written agreement, separate from the deposit agreement, that expressly provided that the sums on deposit, claimed not to be community property, were not to be community property.
